Washington statutes.
RCW 36.93.200

Rules and regulations—Adoption procedure.

Each review board shall adopt rules governing the formal and informal procedures prescribed or authorized by this chapter. Such rules may state the qualifications of persons for practice before the board. Such rules shall also include rules of practice before the board, together with forms and instructions.

To assist interested persons dealing with it, each board shall so far as deemed practicable supplement its rules with descriptive statements of its procedures.

Prior to the adoption of any rule authorized by law, or the amendment or repeal thereof, the board shall file notice thereof with the clerk of the court of the county in which the board is located. So far as practicable, the board shall also publish or otherwise circulate notice of its intended action and afford interested persons opportunity to submit data or views either orally or in writing. Such notice shall include (1) a statement of the time, place, and nature of public rule-making proceedings, (2) reference to the authority under which the rule is proposed, and (3) either the terms or substance of the proposed rule or a description of the subjects and issues involved.

This paragraph shall not apply to interpretative rules, general statements of policy, or rules of internal board organization, procedure or practice.

[ 1967 c 189 s 20.]